Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3715.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142B.65, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Cardiopulmonary resuscitation. (a) Unless training has been completed within the previous two years, the director, staff persons, substitutes, and unsupervised volunteers must satisfactorily complete pediatric cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR) training that meets the requirements of this subdivision. Pediatric CPR training must be completed prior to having unsupervised direct contact with a child, but not to exceed the first 90 days of employment. (b) Pediatric CPR training must be provided by an individual approved to provide pediatric CPR instruction. (c) The pediatric CPR training must: (1) cover CPR techniques for infants and children and the treatment of obstructed airwaysnew text begin , including how to perform back blows on infants and how to perform abdominal thrusts on childrennew text end ; (2) include instruction, hands-on practice, and an in-person, observed skills assessment under the direct supervision of a CPR instructor; and (3) be developed by the American Heart Association, the American Red Cross, or another organization that uses nationally recognized, evidence-based guidelines for CPR. (d) Pediatric CPR training must be repeated at least once every second calendar year. (e) Pediatric CPR training in this subdivision must not be used to meet in-service training requirements under subdivision 9.